District of Columbia statutes.
44-609

Violations and penalties for noncompliance.

(a)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may seek injunctive relief if the Attorney General for the District of Columbia determines that a person is offering, developing, or operating a entity in violation of this chapter.

(b)

Any person, including the principal officers or agents of the for-profit entity, the healthcare entity, or any other party to a conversion subject to the provisions of this chapter, who violates any provision of this chapter by the willful failure to obtain the approval of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia required by § 44-603, or who deviates from the provision of any decision approving a conversion issued pursuant to § 44-603, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not less than $2,500 and not more than $10,000. Each day of a continuing violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History

Oct. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-32, § 10, 44 DCR 4819
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 66, 52 DCR 2638

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-559.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.